Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-4,180
State identification card; issuance
authorized; prior cards; invalid.

Any person who is a resident
of this state may obtain a state identification card with a digital image of the person
included. State identification cards shall be issued in the manner provided
in section 60-4,181. Any identification card issued under prior law prior
to January 1, 1990, shall be invalid after such date.

Laws 1989, LB 284, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 201, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 28;

Laws 2014, LB777, § 11.

Application, see section 60-484.

Duplicate or replacement card, see section 60-4,120.

Expiration, see section 60-490.

Photograph affixed to card, see section 60-4,119.

Prohibited acts, see section 60-491.

Renewal procedure, see section 60-4,122.

Violations, penalties, see section 60-491.